Washington statutes.
RCW 19.40.903

Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

[ 1987 c 444 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 444: See note following RCW 19.40.011.